Illinois, session 104th, SB2539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the 8Insurance Producer Administration Fund to the Department of 9Insurance:10PRODUCER ADMINISTRATION11  For Personal Services............................13,457,00012  For State Contributions to the State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,256,00014  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,029,50015  For Group Insurance...............................5,212,40016  For Contractual Services..........................2,250,00017  For Travel...........................................60,00018  For Commodities......................................15,00019  For Printing.........................................15,00020  For Equipment........................................30,00021  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,870,00022  For Telecommunication Services......................200,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................15,000  SB2539- 2 -OMB104 00030 DPL 10030 b1  For Refunds..........................................45,0002    Total                                         $31,454,900 3    Section 10. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Insurance Producer 5Administration Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs 6and expenses related to or in support of the agency's 7operations. 8    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 10purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the 11Insurance Financial Regulation Fund to the Department of 12Insurance:13FINANCIAL REGULATION14  For Personal Services............................14,955,20015  For State Contributions to the State16   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,952,10017  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,140,10018  For Group Insurance...............................4,648,00019  For Contractual Services..........................3,000,00020  For Travel...........................................75,00021  For Commodities.......................................8,50022  For Printing..........................................3,50023  For Equipment........................................15,00024  For Electronic Data Processing....................3,060,000  SB2539- 3 -OMB104 00030 DPL 10030 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................200,0002  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................15,0003  For Refunds..........................................40,0004    Total                                         $34,112,400 5    Section 20. The sum of $3,750,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Insurance Financial 7Regulation Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs and 8expenses related to or in support of the agency's operations. 9    Section 25. The sum of $1,200,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Insurance Financial 11Regulation Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs 12associated with the establishment, administration and 13operations of the Workers' Compensation Fraud Unit Information 14Technology System. 15    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the Public 18Pension Regulation Fund to the Department of Insurance:19PENSION DIVISION20  For Personal Services...............................523,00021  For State Contributions to the State22   Employees' Retirement System.......................243,20023  For State Contributions to Social Security...........40,000  SB2539- 4 -OMB104 00030 DPL 10030 b1  For Group Insurance.................................199,2002  For Contractual Services..............................5,0003  For Travel............................................2,5004  For Commodities...........................................05  For Printing..............................................06  For Equipment.........................................2,5007  For Telecommunication Services............................08    Total                                          $1,015,400 9    Section 35. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public Pension 11Regulation Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs and 12expenses related to or in support of the agency's operations. 13    Section 40. The sum of $3,200,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Workers' 15Compensation Commission Operations Fund to the Department of 16Insurance for costs associated with the administration and 17operations of the Insurance Fraud Division of the Illinois 18Workers' Compensation Commission's Anti-Fraud Program. 19    Section 45. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Parity Advancement 21Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs and expenses 22related to or in support of parity compliance advocacy, 23consumer education, and any other initiatives that support   SB2539- 5 -OMB104 00030 DPL 10030 b1parity implementation and enforcement on behalf of consumers. 2    Section 50. The sum of $39,267,300, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Health 4Benefits Exchange Fund to the Department of Insurance for 5costs associated with implementation of the Illinois Health 6Benefits Exchange. 7    Section 55. The sum of $375,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Insurance Producer 9Administration Fund to the Department of Insurance for 10ordinary and contingent expenses related to or in support of 11the Division of Healthcare Access. 12    Section 60. The sum of $375,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the Insurance Producer 14Administration Fund to the Department of Insurance for costs 15associated with the administration and operations of the 16Health Care Protection Act. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182025.